Missouri, session 2026, HB1740.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 302.304, 302.440, 302.525, 302.574, and 577.010, RSMo, are
repealed and six new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 302.304,
302.440, 302.525, 302.574, 454.1050, and 577.010, to read as follows:
302.304. 1. The director shall notify by ordinary mail any operator of the point value
charged against the operator's record when the record shows four or more points have been
accumulated in a twelve-month period.
2. In an action to suspend or revoke a license or driving privilege under this section
points shall be accumulated on the date of conviction. No case file of any conviction for a
driving violation for which points may be assessed pursuant to section 302.302 may be closed
until such time as a copy of the record of such conviction is forwarded to the department of
revenue.
3. The director shall suspend the license and driving privileges of any person whose
driving record shows the driver has accumulated eight points in eighteen months.
4. The license and driving privilege of any person whose license and driving privilege
have been suspended under the provisions of sections 302.010 to 302.540 except those
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

SS SCS HB 1740 2
persons whose license and driving privilege have been suspended under the provisions of
subdivision (8) of subsection 1 of section 302.302 or has accumulated sufficient points
together with a conviction under subdivision (10) of subsection 1 of section 302.302 and who
has filed proof of financial responsibility with the department of revenue, in accordance with
chapter 303, and is otherwise eligible, shall be reinstated as follows:
(1) In the case of an initial suspension, thirty days after the effective date of the
suspension;
(2) In the case of a second suspension, sixty days after the effective date of the
suspension;
(3) In the case of the third and subsequent suspensions, ninety days after the effective
date of the suspension.

Unless proof of financial responsibility is filed with the department of revenue, a suspension
shall continue in effect for two years from its effective date.
5. The period of suspension of the driver's license and driving privilege of any person
under the provisions of subdivision (8) of subsection 1 of section 302.302 or who has
accumulated sufficient points together with a conviction under subdivision (10) of subsection
1 of section 302.302 shall be thirty days, followed by a sixty-day period of restricted driving
privilege as defined in section 302.010. Upon completion of such period of restricted driving
privilege, upon compliance with other requirements of law and upon filing of proof of
financial responsibility with the department of revenue, in accordance with chapter 303, the
license and driving privilege shall be reinstated. If a person, otherwise subject to the
provisions of this subsection, files proof of installation with the department of revenue that
any vehicle operated by such person is equipped with a functioning, certified ignition
interlock device, there shall be no period of suspension. However, in lieu of a suspension the
person shall instead complete a ninety-day period of restricted driving privilege. If the person
fails to maintain such proof of the device with the director of revenue as required, the
restricted driving privilege shall be terminated. Upon completion of such ninety-day period
of restricted driving privilege, upon compliance with other requirements of law, and upon
filing of proof of financial responsibility with the department of revenue, in accordance with
chapter 303, the license and driving privilege shall be reinstated. However, if the monthly
monitoring reports during such ninety-day period indicate that the ignition interlock device
has registered a confirmed blood alcohol concentration level above the alcohol setpoint
established by the department of transportation or such reports indicate that the ignition
interlock device has been tampered with or circumvented, then the license and driving
privilege of such person shall not be reinstated until the person completes an additional thirty-
day period of restricted driving privilege.

SS SCS HB 1740 3
6. If the person fails to maintain proof of financial responsibility in accordance with
chapter 303, or, if applicable, if the person fails to maintain proof that any vehicle operated is
equipped with a functioning, certified ignition interlock device installed pursuant to
subsection 5 of this section, the person's driving privilege and license shall be resuspended.
7. The director shall revoke the license and driving privilege of any person when the
person's driving record shows such person has accumulated twelve points in twelve months or
eighteen points in twenty-four months or twenty-four points in thirty-six months. The
revocation period of any person whose license and driving privilege have been revoked under
the provisions of sections 302.010 to 302.540 and who has filed proof of financial
responsibility with the department of revenue in accordance with chapter 303 and is otherwise
eligible, shall be terminated by a notice from the director of revenue after one year from the
effective date of the revocation. Unless proof of financial responsibility is filed with the
department of revenue, except as provided in subsection 2 of section 302.541, the revocation
shall remain in effect for a period of two years from its effective date. If the person fails to
maintain proof of financial responsibility in accordance with chapter 303, the person's license
and driving privilege shall be rerevoked. Any person whose license and driving privilege
have been revoked under the provisions of sections 302.010 to 302.540 shall, upon receipt of
the notice of termination of the revocation from the director, pass the complete driver
examination and apply for a new license before again operating a motor vehicle upon the
highways of this state.
8. If, prior to conviction for an offense that would require suspension or revocation of
a person's license under the provisions of this section, the person's total points accumulated
are reduced, pursuant to the provisions of section 302.306, below the number of points
required for suspension or revocation pursuant to the provisions of this section, then the
person's license shall not be suspended or revoked until the necessary points are again
obtained and accumulated.
9. If any person shall neglect or refuse to surrender the person's license, as provided
herein, the director shall direct the state highway patrol or any peace or police officer to
secure possession thereof and return it to the director.
10. Upon the issuance of a reinstatement or termination notice after a suspension or
revocation of any person's license and driving privilege under the provisions of sections
302.010 to 302.540, the accumulated point value shall be reduced to four points, except that
the points of any person serving as a member of the Armed Forces of the United States
outside the limits of the United States during a period of suspension or revocation shall be
reduced to zero upon the date of the reinstatement or termination of notice. It shall be the
responsibility of such member of the Armed Forces to submit copies of official orders to the
director of revenue to substantiate such overseas service. Any other provision of sections

SS SCS HB 1740 4
302.010 to 302.540 to the contrary notwithstanding, the effective date of the four points
remaining on the record upon reinstatement or termination shall be the date of the
reinstatement or termination notice.
11. No credit toward reduction of points shall be given during periods of suspension
or revocation or any period of driving under a limited driving privilege granted by a court or
the director of revenue.
12. Any person or nonresident whose license or privilege to operate a motor vehicle
in this state has been suspended or revoked under this or any other law shall, before having
the license or privilege to operate a motor vehicle reinstated, pay to the director a
reinstatement fee of twenty dollars which shall be in addition to all other fees provided by
law.
13. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, if after two years from
the effective date of any suspension or revocation issued under this chapter, except any
100 suspension or revocation issued under section 302.410, 302.462, or 302.574, the person or
101 nonresident has not paid the reinstatement fee of twenty dollars, the director shall reinstate
102 such license or privilege to operate a motor vehicle in this state. Any person who has had his
103 or her license suspended or revoked under section 302.410, 302.462, or 302.574, shall be
104 required to pay the reinstatement fee.
105 14. No person who has had a license to operate a motor vehicle suspended or revoked
106 as a result of an assessment of points for a violation under subdivision (8), (9) or (10) of
107 subsection 1 of section 302.302 shall have that license reinstated until such person has
108 participated in and successfully completed a substance abuse traffic offender program defined
109 in section 302.010, or a program determined to be comparable by the department of mental
110 health. Assignment recommendations, based upon the needs assessment as described in
111 subdivision (24) of section 302.010, shall be delivered in writing to the person with written
112 notice that the person is entitled to have such assignment recommendations reviewed by the
113 court if the person objects to the recommendations. The person may file a motion in the
114 associate division of the circuit court of the county in which such assignment was given, on a
115 printed form provided by the state courts administrator, to have the court hear and determine
116 such motion pursuant to the provisions of chapter 517. The motion shall name the person or
117 entity making the needs assessment as the respondent and a copy of the motion shall be
118 served upon the respondent in any manner allowed by law. Upon hearing the motion, the
119 court may modify or waive any assignment recommendation that the court determines to be
120 unwarranted based upon a review of the needs assessment, the person's driving record, the
121 circumstances surrounding the offense, and the likelihood of the person committing a like
122 offense in the future, except that the court may modify but may not waive the assignment to
123 an education or rehabilitation program of a person determined to be a prior or persistent

SS SCS HB 1740 5
124 offender as defined in section 577.001 or of a person determined to have operated a motor
125 vehicle with fifteen-hundredths of one percent or more by weight in such person's blood.
126 Compliance with the court determination of the motion shall satisfy the provisions of this
127 section for the purpose of reinstating such person's license to operate a motor vehicle. The
128 respondent's personal appearance at any hearing conducted pursuant to this subsection shall
129 not be necessary unless directed by the court.
130 15. The fees for the program authorized in subsection 14 of this section, or a portion
131 thereof to be determined by the department of mental health, shall be paid by the person
132 enrolled in the program. Any person who is enrolled in the program shall pay, in addition to
133 any fee charged for the program, a supplemental fee in an amount to be determined by the
134 department of mental health for the purposes of funding the substance abuse traffic offender
135 program defined in section 302.010 or a program determined to be comparable by the
136 department of mental health. The administrator of the program shall remit to the division of
137 alcohol and drug abuse of the department of mental health on or before the fifteenth day of
138 each month the supplemental fee for all persons enrolled in the program, less two percent for
139 administrative costs. Interest shall be charged on any unpaid balance of the supplemental fees
140 due the division of alcohol and drug abuse pursuant to this section and shall accrue at a rate
141 not to exceed the annual rate established pursuant to the provisions of section 32.065, plus
142 three percentage points. The supplemental fees and any interest received by the department
143 of mental health pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the mental health earnings fund
144 which is created in section 630.053.
145 16. Any administrator who fails to remit to the division of alcohol and drug abuse of
146 the department of mental health the supplemental fees and interest for all persons enrolled in
147 the program pursuant to this section shall be subject to a penalty equal to the amount of
148 interest accrued on the supplemental fees due the division pursuant to this section. If the
149 supplemental fees, interest, and penalties are not remitted to the division of alcohol and drug
150 abuse of the department of mental health within six months of the due date, the attorney
151 general of the state of Missouri shall initiate appropriate action of the collection of said fees
152 and interest accrued. The court shall assess attorney fees and court costs against any
153 delinquent program.
154 17. Any person who has had a license to operate a motor vehicle suspended or
155 revoked as a result of:
156 (1) An assessment of points for a conviction for an intoxication-related traffic
157 offense, as defined under section 577.001, in which the person's blood alcohol content was
158 found to be at least eight-hundredths of one percent but less than fifteen-hundredths of
159 one percent by weight of alcohol in such person's blood and who has a prior alcohol-
160 related enforcement contact as defined under section 302.525[,]; or

SS SCS HB 1740 6
161 (2) An assessment of points for a conviction for an intoxication-related traffic
162 offense, as defined under section 577.001, in which the person's blood alcohol content
163 was found to be fifteen-hundredths of one percent or more by weight of alcohol in such
164 person's blood, or in which the person caused any property damage or personal injury
165
166 shall be required to file proof with the director of revenue that any motor vehicle operated by
167 the person is equipped with a functioning, certified ignition interlock device as a required
168 condition of reinstatement of the license. The ignition interlock device shall further be
169 required to be maintained on all motor vehicles operated by the person for a period of not less
170 than six months immediately following the date of reinstatement. If the monthly monitoring
171 reports show that the ignition interlock device has registered any confirmed blood alcohol
172 concentration readings above the alcohol setpoint established by the department of
173 transportation or that the person has tampered with or circumvented the ignition interlock
174 device within the last three months of the six-month period of required installation of the
175 ignition interlock device, then the period for which the person must maintain the ignition
176 interlock device following the date of reinstatement shall be extended until the person has
177 completed three consecutive months with no violations as described in this section. If the
178 person fails to maintain such proof with the director, the license shall be resuspended or
179 revoked and the person shall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
180 18. A certified ignition interlock device provider shall adopt a discounted fee
181 schedule that provides for the payment of the costs of the certified ignition interlock
182 device by offenders with an income at or below one hundred and fifty percent of the
183 federal poverty level. A person with an income at or below one hundred and fifty
184 percent of the federal poverty level who provides income verification shall be
185 responsible for ten percent of the cost of the ignition interlock device. Any additional
186 costs accrued by the person for noncompliance with program requirements are not
187 subject to discounted rates and are the sole responsibility of the person. The certified
188 ignition interlock provider shall verify the offender's income to determine the cost of the
189 ignition interlock device by verifying from the offender the previous year's federal
190 income tax return, the previous three months of weekly or monthly income statements,
191 or a court order declaring the person with an income at or below one hundred and fifty
192 percent of the federal poverty level.
302.440. In addition to any other provisions of law, a court may require that any
person who is found guilty of a first intoxication-related traffic offense, as defined in section
577.001, and a court shall require that any person who is found guilty of a second or
subsequent intoxication-related traffic offense, as defined in section 577.001, or any person
who is found guilty of an intoxication-related traffic offense, as defined under section

SS SCS HB 1740 7
577.001, in which the person's blood alcohol content was found to be fifteen-hundredths
of one percent or more by weight of alcohol in such person's blood, or in which the
person caused any property damage or personal injury shall not operate any motor
vehicle unless that vehicle is equipped with a functioning, certified ignition interlock device
that the person must use for a period of not less than six months from the date of
reinstatement of the person's driver's license. In addition, any court authorized to grant a
limited driving privilege under section 302.309 to any person who is found guilty of a second
or subsequent intoxication-related traffic offense or to any person who is found guilty of an
intoxication-related traffic offense, as defined under section 577.001, in which the
person's blood alcohol content was found to be fifteen-hundredths of one percent or
more by weight of alcohol in such person's blood, or in which the person caused any
property damage or personal injury shall require the use of an ignition interlock device on
all vehicles operated by the person as a required condition of the limited driving privilege,
except as provided in section 302.441. These requirements shall be in addition to any other
provisions of this chapter or chapter 577 requiring installation and maintenance of an ignition
interlock device. Any person required to use an ignition interlock device shall comply with
such requirement subject to the penalties provided by section 577.599.
302.525. 1. The license suspension or revocation shall become effective fifteen days
after the subject person has received the notice of suspension or revocation as provided in
section 302.520, or is deemed to have received the notice of suspension or revocation by mail
as provided in section 302.515. If a request for a hearing is received by or postmarked to the
department within that fifteen-day period, the effective date of the suspension or revocation
shall be stayed until a final order is issued following the hearing; provided, that any delay in
the hearing which is caused or requested by the subject person or counsel representing that
person without good cause shown shall not result in a stay of the suspension or revocation
during the period of delay.
2. The period of license suspension or revocation under this section shall be as
follows:
(1) If the person's driving record shows no prior alcohol-related enforcement contacts
during the immediately preceding five years, the period of suspension shall be thirty days
after the effective date of suspension, followed by a sixty-day period of restricted driving
privilege as defined in section 302.010 and issued by the director of revenue. The restricted
driving privilege shall not be issued until he or she has filed proof of financial responsibility
with the department of revenue, in accordance with chapter 303, and is otherwise eligible.
The restricted driving privilege shall indicate [whether] that a functioning, certified ignition
interlock device is required as a condition of operating a motor vehicle. A copy of the
restricted driving privilege shall be given to the person and such person shall carry a copy of

SS SCS HB 1740 8
the restricted driving privilege while operating a motor vehicle. In no case shall restricted
driving privileges be issued pursuant to this section or section 302.535 until the person has
completed the first thirty days of a suspension under this section. If a person otherwise
subject to the provisions of this subdivision files proof of installation with the department of
revenue that any vehicle that he or she operates is equipped with a functioning, certified
ignition interlock device, there shall be no period of suspension. However, in lieu of a
suspension the person shall instead complete a ninety-day period of restricted driving
privilege. Upon completion of such ninety-day period of restricted driving privilege,
compliance with other requirements of law, and filing of proof of financial responsibility with
the department of revenue, in accordance with chapter 303, the license and driving privilege
shall be reinstated. However, if the monthly monitoring reports during such ninety-day
period indicate that the ignition interlock device has registered a confirmed blood alcohol
concentration level above the alcohol setpoint established by the department of transportation
or such reports indicate that the ignition interlock device has been tampered with or
circumvented, then the license and driving privilege of such person shall not be reinstated
until the person completes an additional thirty-day period of restricted driving privilege. If
the person fails to maintain such proof of the device with the director of revenue as required,
the restricted driving privilege shall be terminated;
(2) The period of revocation shall be one year if the person's driving record shows
one or more prior alcohol-related enforcement contacts during the immediately preceding five
years;
(3) In no case shall restricted driving privileges be issued under this section to any
person whose driving record shows one or more prior alcohol-related enforcement contacts or
to any person whose driving record shows a conviction of an intoxication-related traffic
offense, as defined under section 577.001, in which the person's blood alcohol content
was found to be fifteen-hundredths of one percent or more by weight of alcohol in such
person's blood, or in which the person caused any property damage or personal injury
until the person has filed proof with the department of revenue that any motor vehicle
operated by the person is equipped with a functioning, certified ignition interlock device as a
required condition of the restricted driving privilege. If the person fails to maintain such
proof the restricted driving privilege shall be terminated.
3. For purposes of this section, "alcohol-related enforcement contacts" shall include
any suspension or revocation under sections 302.500 to 302.540, any suspension or
revocation entered in this or any other state for a refusal to submit to chemical testing under
an implied consent law, and any conviction in this or any other state for a violation which
involves driving while intoxicated, driving while under the influence of drugs or alcohol, or
driving a vehicle while having an unlawful alcohol concentration.

SS SCS HB 1740 9
4. Where a license is suspended or revoked under this section and the person is also
convicted on charges arising out of the same occurrence for a violation of section 577.010 or
577.012 or for a violation of any county or municipal ordinance prohibiting driving while
intoxicated or alcohol-related traffic offense, both the suspension or revocation under this
section and any other suspension or revocation arising from such convictions shall be
imposed, but the period of suspension or revocation under sections 302.500 to 302.540 shall
be credited against any other suspension or revocation arising from such convictions, and the
total period of suspension or revocation shall not exceed the longer of the two suspension or
revocation periods.
5. Any person who has had a license to operate a motor vehicle revoked under this
section or suspended under this section with one or more prior alcohol-related enforcement
contacts or a conviction for an intoxication-related traffic offense, as defined under
section 577.001, in which the person's blood alcohol content was found to be fifteen-
hundredths of one percent or more by weight of alcohol in such person's blood, or in
which the person caused any property damage or personal injury showing on their driver
record shall be required to file proof with the director of revenue that any motor vehicle
operated by that person is equipped with a functioning, certified ignition interlock device as a
required condition of reinstatement. The ignition interlock device shall further be required to
be maintained on all motor vehicles operated by the person for a period of not less than six
months immediately following the date of reinstatement. If the monthly monitoring reports
show that the ignition interlock device has registered any confirmed blood alcohol
concentration readings above the alcohol setpoint established by the department of
transportation or that the person has tampered with or circumvented the ignition interlock
device within the last three months of the six-month period of required installation of the
ignition interlock device, then the period for which the person must maintain the ignition
interlock device following the date of reinstatement shall be extended until the person has
completed three consecutive months with no violations as described in this section. If the
person fails to maintain such proof with the director, the license shall be suspended or
revoked, until proof as required by this section is filed with the director, and the person shall
be guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
302.574. 1. If a person who was operating a vehicle refuses upon the request of the
officer to submit to any chemical test under section 577.041, the officer shall, on behalf of the
director of revenue, serve the notice of license revocation personally upon the person and
shall take possession of any license to operate a vehicle issued by this state which is held by
that person. The officer shall issue a temporary permit, on behalf of the director of revenue,
which is valid for fifteen days and shall also give the person notice of his or her right to file a
petition for review to contest the license revocation.

SS SCS HB 1740 10
2. Such officer shall make a certified report under penalties of perjury for making a
false statement to a public official. The report shall be forwarded to the director of revenue
and shall include the following:
(1) That the officer has:
(a) Reasonable grounds to believe that the arrested person was driving a motor
vehicle while in an intoxicated condition; or
(b) Reasonable grounds to believe that the person stopped, being under the age of
twenty-one years, was driving a motor vehicle with a blood alcohol content of two-
hundredths of one percent or more by weight; or
(c) Reasonable grounds to believe that the person stopped, being under the age of
twenty-one years, was committing a violation of the traffic laws of the state, or political
subdivision of the state, and such officer has reasonable grounds to believe, after making such
stop, that the person had a blood alcohol content of two-hundredths of one percent or greater;
(2) That the person refused to submit to a chemical test;
(3) Whether the officer secured the license to operate a motor vehicle of the person;
(4) Whether the officer issued a fifteen-day temporary permit;
(5) Copies of the notice of revocation, the fifteen-day temporary permit, and the
notice of the right to file a petition for review. The notices and permit may be combined in
one document; and
(6) Any license, which the officer has taken into possession, to operate a motor
vehicle.
3. Upon receipt of the officer's report, the director shall revoke the license of the
person refusing to take the test for a period of one year; or if the person is a nonresident, such
person's operating permit or privilege shall be revoked for one year; or if the person is a
resident without a license or permit to operate a motor vehicle in this state, an order shall be
issued denying the person the issuance of a license or permit for a period of one year.
4. If a person's license has been revoked because of the person's refusal to submit to a
chemical test, such person may petition for a hearing before a circuit division or associate
division of the court in the county in which the arrest or stop occurred. Pursuant to local court
rule promulgated pursuant to Section 15 of Article V of the Missouri Constitution, the case
may also be assigned to a traffic judge pursuant to section 479.500. The person may request
such court to issue an order staying the revocation until such time as the petition for review
can be heard. If the court, in its discretion, grants such stay, it shall enter the order upon a
form prescribed by the director of revenue and shall send a copy of such order to the director.
Such order shall serve as proof of the privilege to operate a motor vehicle in this state and the
director shall maintain possession of the person's license to operate a motor vehicle until
termination of any revocation under this section. Upon the person's request, the clerk of the

SS SCS HB 1740 11
court shall notify the prosecuting attorney of the county and the prosecutor shall appear at the
hearing on behalf of the director of revenue. At the hearing, the court shall determine only:
(1) Whether the person was arrested or stopped;
(2) Whether the officer had:
(a) Reasonable grounds to believe that the person was driving a motor vehicle while
in an intoxicated or drugged condition; or
(b) Reasonable grounds to believe that the person stopped, being under the age of
twenty-one years, was driving a motor vehicle with a blood alcohol content of two-
hundredths of one percent or more by weight; or
(c) Reasonable grounds to believe that the person stopped, being under the age of
twenty-one years, was committing a violation of the traffic laws of the state, or political
subdivision of the state, and such officer had reasonable grounds to believe, after making such
stop, that the person had a blood alcohol content of two-hundredths of one percent or greater;
and
(3) Whether the person refused to submit to the test.
5. If the court determines any issue not to be in the affirmative, the court shall order
the director to reinstate the license or permit to drive.
6. Requests for review as provided in this section shall go to the head of the docket of
the court wherein filed.
7. No person who has had a license to operate a motor vehicle suspended or revoked
under the provisions of this section shall have that license reinstated until such person has
participated in and successfully completed a substance abuse traffic offender program defined
in section 302.010, or a program determined to be comparable by the department of mental
health. Assignment recommendations, based upon the needs assessment as described in
subdivision (24) of section 302.010, shall be delivered in writing to the person with written
notice that the person is entitled to have such assignment recommendations reviewed by the
court if the person objects to the recommendations. The person may file a motion in the
associate division of the circuit court of the county in which such assignment was given, on a
printed form provided by the state courts administrator, to have the court hear and determine
such motion under the provisions of chapter 517. The motion shall name the person or entity
making the needs assessment as the respondent and a copy of the motion shall be served upon
the respondent in any manner allowed by law. Upon hearing the motion, the court may
modify or waive any assignment recommendation that the court determines to be unwarranted
based upon a review of the needs assessment, the person's driving record, the circumstances
surrounding the offense, and the likelihood of the person committing a similar offense in the
future, except that the court may modify but shall not waive the assignment to an education or
rehabilitation program of a person determined to be a prior or persistent offender as defined in

SS SCS HB 1740 12
section 577.001, or of a person determined to have operated a motor vehicle with a blood
alcohol content of fifteen-hundredths of one percent or more by weight. Compliance with the
court determination of the motion shall satisfy the provisions of this section for the purpose of
reinstating such person's license to operate a motor vehicle. The respondent's personal
appearance at any hearing conducted under this subsection shall not be necessary unless
directed by the court.
8. The fees for the substance abuse traffic offender program, or a portion thereof, to
be determined by the division of behavioral health of the department of mental health, shall
be paid by the person enrolled in the program. Any person who is enrolled in the program
shall pay, in addition to any fee charged for the program, a supplemental fee to be determined
by the department of mental health for the purposes of funding the substance abuse traffic
offender program defined in section 302.010. The administrator of the program shall remit to
the division of behavioral health of the department of mental health on or before the fifteenth
day of each month the supplemental fee for all persons enrolled in the program, less two
percent for administrative costs. Interest shall be charged on any unpaid balance of the
supplemental fees due to the division of behavioral health under this section, and shall accrue
at a rate not to exceed the annual rates established under the provisions of section 32.065, plus
three percentage points. The supplemental fees and any interest received by the department
100 of mental health under this section shall be deposited in the mental health earnings fund,
101 which is created in section 630.053.
102 9. Any administrator who fails to remit to the division of behavioral health of the
103 department of mental health the supplemental fees and interest for all persons enrolled in the
104 program under this section shall be subject to a penalty equal to the amount of interest
105 accrued on the supplemental fees due to the division under this section. If the supplemental
106 fees, interest, and penalties are not remitted to the division of behavioral health of the
107 department of mental health within six months of the due date, the attorney general of the
108 state of Missouri shall initiate appropriate action for the collection of said fees and accrued
109 interest. The court shall assess attorneys' fees and court costs against any delinquent program.
110 10. Any person who has had a license to operate a motor vehicle revoked under this
111 section and who has a prior alcohol-related enforcement contact, as defined in section
112 302.525, or who has been convicted of an intoxication-related traffic offense, as defined
113 under section 577.001, in which the person's blood alcohol content was found to be
114 fifteen-hundredths of one percent or more by weight of alcohol in such person's blood,
115 or in which the person caused any property damage or personal injury shall be required
116 to file proof with the director of revenue that any motor vehicle operated by the person is
117 equipped with a functioning, certified ignition interlock device as a required condition of
118 license reinstatement. Such ignition interlock device shall further be required to be

SS SCS HB 1740 13
119 maintained on all motor vehicles operated by the person for a period of not less than six
120 months immediately following the date of reinstatement. If the monthly monitoring reports
121 show that the ignition interlock device has registered any confirmed blood alcohol
122 concentration readings above the alcohol setpoint established by the department of
123 transportation or that the person has tampered with or circumvented the ignition interlock
124 device within the last three months of the six-month period of required installation of the
125 ignition interlock device, then the period for which the person shall maintain the ignition
126 interlock device following the date of reinstatement shall be extended until the person has
127 completed three consecutive months with no violations as described in this section. If the
128 person fails to maintain such proof with the director as required by this section, the license
129 shall be rerevoked until proof as required by this section is filed with the director, and the
130 person shall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
131 11. The revocation period of any person whose license and driving privilege has been
132 revoked under this section and who has filed proof of financial responsibility with the
133 department of revenue in accordance with chapter 303 and is otherwise eligible shall be
134 terminated by a notice from the director of revenue after one year from the effective date of
135 the revocation. Unless proof of financial responsibility is filed with the department of
136 revenue, the revocation shall remain in effect for a period of two years from its effective date.
137 If the person fails to maintain proof of financial responsibility in accordance with chapter 303,
138 the person's license and driving privilege shall be rerevoked.
139 12. A person commits the offense of failure to maintain proof with the Missouri
140 department of revenue if, when required to do so, he or she fails to file proof with the director
141 of revenue that any vehicle operated by the person is equipped with a functioning, certified
142 ignition interlock device or fails to file proof of financial responsibility with the department of
143 revenue in accordance with chapter 303. The offense of failure to maintain proof with the
144 Missouri department of revenue is a class A misdemeanor.
454.1050. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as "Bentley and
Mason's Law".
2. If a person has been convicted of, pled guilty to, or entered a plea of nolo
contendere to an offense under sections 577.010 or 577.012, such offense caused the
death of a parent or parents of a child or children, and a surviving parent or guardian
files a petition to receive child maintenance from the person, such person shall be
ordered by the court to pay child maintenance to the child or children until the child or
children:
(1) Die;
(2) Marry;
(3) Enter active military duty;

SS SCS HB 1740 14
(4) Reach eighteen years of age unless the provisions of subsection 3 of this
section apply; or
(5) Reach twenty-one years of age unless the provisions of the maintenance order
specifically extend beyond the child's or children's twenty-first birthdays for reasons
provided under subdivision (1) of subsection 3 of this section.
3. (1) If the child or children are physically or mentally incapacitated from
supporting themselves and insolvent and unmarried, the court may extend the
maintenance obligation past the child's or children's eighteenth birthday.
(2) (a) If the child or children reach eighteen years of age and are enrolled in
and attending a secondary school program of instruction, maintenance shall continue, if
the child or children continue to attend and progress toward completion of such
program, until the child or children complete such program or reach twenty-one years
of age, whichever first occurs.
(b) If the child or children are enrolled in an institution of vocational or higher
education no later than October first following graduation from a secondary school or
completion of a graduation equivalence degree program and so long as the child or
children enroll for and complete at least twelve hours of credit each semester, not
including the summer semester, at an institution of vocational or higher education and
achieve grades sufficient to reenroll at such institution, maintenance shall continue until
the child or children complete their education or until the child or children reach
twenty-one years of age, whichever first occurs. To remain eligible for such continued
maintenance, at the beginning of each semester the child or children shall submit to the
court a transcript or similar official document provided by the institution of vocational
or higher education that includes the courses the child or children are enrolled in and
have completed for each term, the grades and credits received for each such course, and
an official document from the institution listing the courses that the child or children are
enrolled in for the upcoming term and the number of credits for each such course.
When enrolled in at least twelve credit hours, if the child or children receive failing
grades in half or more of the child's or children's courseload in any one semester,
payment of maintenance for the child or children receiving the failing grades may be
terminated and shall not be eligible for reinstatement. Upon request for notification of
the child's or children's grades by the court, the child or children shall produce the
required documents to the court within thirty days of receipt of grades from the
education institution. If the child or children fail to produce the required documents,
payment of maintenance may terminate without the accrual of any maintenance
arrearage and shall not be eligible for reinstatement. If the circumstances of the child or
children manifestly dictate, the court may waive the October first deadline for

SS SCS HB 1740 15
enrollment required by this subdivision. As used in this subdivision, "institution of
vocational education" means any postsecondary training or schooling for which the
child is assessed a fee and attends classes regularly. "Higher education" means any
community college, college, or university at which the child attends classes regularly. A
child or children who have been diagnosed with a developmental disability, as defined
under section 630.005, or whose physical disability or diagnosed health problem limits
the child's or children's ability to carry the number of credit hours prescribed in this
subdivision, shall remain eligible for maintenance so long as such child or children are
enrolled in and attending an institution of vocational or higher education and the child
or children continue to meet the other requirements of this subdivision. A child or
children who are employed at least fifteen hours per week during the semester may take
as few as nine credit hours per semester and remain eligible for maintenance so long as
all other requirements of this subdivision are complied with.
4. The court shall order the person who was convicted, pled guilty to, or entered
a plea of nolo contendere to an offense under sections 577.010 or 577.012 as provided
under subsection 2 of this section to pay maintenance in an amount that is reasonable or
necessary for the maintenance of the child or children after considering all relevant
factors, including:
(1) The financial needs and resources of the child or children;
(2) The financial resources and needs of the surviving parent or, if no other
parent is alive or capable of caring for the child or children, the guardian of the child or
children, including the state if the state is the guardian;
(3) The standard of living the child or children would have enjoyed;
(4) The physical and emotional condition of the child or children and the child's
or children's educational needs;
(5) The child's or children's physical and legal custody arrangements; and
(6) The reasonable work-related child care expenses of the surviving parent or
guardian.
5. In addition to the relevant factors listed under subsection 4 of this section, the
court shall consider the guidelines set out under subsection 8 of section 452.340 and
Missouri supreme court civil procedure rule form 14 in determining the amount
reasonable or necessary for the maintenance of the child or children.
6. (1) The court shall order that child maintenance payments be made to the
circuit clerk as trustee for remittance to the surviving parent or guardian entitled to
receive the payments. The circuit clerk shall remit such payments to the surviving
parent or guardian within three working days of receipt by the circuit clerk. Circuit
clerks shall deposit all receipts no later than the next working day after receipt.

SS SCS HB 1740 16
(2) As an alternative to subdivision (1) of this subsection, the court may, upon its
own motion, order that maintenance payments be made to the family support payment
center established under section 454.530 as trustee for remittance to the surviving
parent or guardian. However, the court shall not order payments to be made to the
payment center if the family support division notifies the court that such payments shall
not be made to the center. In such cases, payments shall be made to the clerk as trustee
until the division notifies the court that payments shall be directed to the payment
center.
7. In addition to any other remedy provided by law for the enforcement of child
maintenance, if a maintenance order has been entered, the director of the family
support division or the director's designee shall issue an order directing any employer or
other payer of the person required to pay child maintenance under this section to
withhold and pay over to the family support division or the clerk of the circuit court in
the county in which a trusteeship is or will be established moneys due or to become due
100 to the surviving parent or guardian for the child or children in an amount not to exceed
101 federal wage garnishment limitations.
102 8. If a person ordered to pay child maintenance under this section is
103 incarcerated and unable to pay the required maintenance, the person shall have up to
104 one year after the release from incarceration to begin payment, including any arrearage.
105 If any obligation under this section is to terminate as provided under subsection 2 of this
106 section but the person's obligation is not paid in full, payments shall continue until the
107 entire arrearage is paid.
108 9. (1) If the surviving parent or guardian of the child or children brings a civil
109 action on behalf of such child or children against the person who was convicted of, pled
110 guilty to, or entered a plea of nolo contendere to an offense under sections 577.010 or
111 577.012 prior to any child maintenance order under this section and the surviving
112 parent or guardian obtains a judgment in his or her favor in the civil suit, no
113 maintenance shall be ordered under this section.
114 (2) If the court orders child maintenance under this section but the surviving
115 parent or guardian brings a civil action and obtains a judgment on behalf of such child
116 or children in his or her favor, the child maintenance order shall offset the judgment
117 awarded in the civil action.
118 (3) No funds received under section 595.045 shall result in a reduction of an
119 amount provided by a child maintenance order under this section.
120 10. The provisions of any order respecting maintenance under this section may
121 be modified only upon a showing of changed circumstances so substantial and
122 continuing as to make the terms unreasonable.

SS SCS HB 1740 17
577.010. 1. A person commits the offense of driving while intoxicated if he or she
operates a vehicle while in an intoxicated condition.
2. The offense of driving while intoxicated is:
(1) A class B misdemeanor;
(2) A class A misdemeanor if:
(a) The defendant is a prior offender; or
(b) A person less than seventeen years of age is present in the vehicle;
(3) A class E felony if[:
(a)] the defendant is a persistent offender; [or
(b) While driving while intoxicated, the defendant acts with criminal negligence to
cause physical injury to another person;]
(4) A class D felony if:
(a) The defendant is an aggravated offender; or
(b) While driving while intoxicated, the defendant acts with criminal negligence to
cause physical injury to [a law enforcement officer or emergency personnel] another person;
[or
(c) While driving while intoxicated, the defendant acts with criminal negligence to
cause serious physical injury to another person;]
(5) A class C felony if:
(a) The defendant is a chronic offender; or
(b) While driving while intoxicated, the defendant acts with criminal negligence to
cause serious physical injury to [a law enforcement officer or emergency personnel] another
person; [or
(c) While driving while intoxicated, the defendant acts with criminal negligence to
cause the death of another person;]
(6) A class B felony if:
(a) The defendant is a habitual offender; or
(b) While driving while intoxicated, the defendant acts with criminal negligence to
cause the death of [a law enforcement officer or emergency personnel] another person;
[(c) While driving while intoxicated, the defendant acts with criminal negligence to
cause the death of any person not a passenger in the vehicle operated by the defendant,
including the death of an individual that results from the defendant's vehicle leaving a
highway, as defined in section 301.010, or the highway's right-of-way;
(d) While driving while intoxicated, the defendant acts with criminal negligence to
cause the death of two or more persons; or

SS SCS HB 1740 18
(e) While driving while intoxicated, the defendant acts with criminal negligence to
cause the death of any person while he or she has a blood alcohol content of at least eighteen-
hundredths of one percent by weight of alcohol in such person's blood;]
(7) A class A felony if:
(a) While driving while intoxicated, the defendant acts with criminal negligence
to cause the death of any person;
(b) The defendant has previously been found guilty of an offense under [paragraphs]
paragraph (a) [to (e)] or (b) of subdivision (6) of this subsection and is found guilty of a
subsequent violation of [such paragraphs] this section.
3. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 2 of this section, a person found
guilty of the offense of driving while intoxicated as a first offense shall not be granted a
suspended imposition of sentence:
(1) Unless such person shall be placed on probation for a minimum of two years; or
(2) In a circuit where a DWI court or docket created under section 478.007 or other
court-ordered treatment program is available, and where the offense was committed with
fifteen-hundredths of one percent or more by weight of alcohol in such person's blood, unless
the individual participates and successfully completes a program under such DWI court or
docket or other court-ordered treatment program.
4. If a person is found guilty of a second or subsequent offense of driving while
intoxicated, the court may order the person to submit to a period of continuous alcohol
monitoring or verifiable breath alcohol testing performed a minimum of four times per day as
a condition of probation.
5. If a person is not granted a suspended imposition of sentence for the reasons
described in subsection 3 of this section:
(1) If the individual operated the vehicle with fifteen-hundredths to twenty-
hundredths of one percent by weight of alcohol in such person's blood, the required term of
imprisonment shall be not less than forty-eight hours;
(2) If the individual operated the vehicle with greater than twenty-hundredths of one
percent by weight of alcohol in such person's blood, the required term of imprisonment shall
be not less than five days.
6. A person found guilty of the offense of driving while intoxicated:
(1) As a prior offender, persistent offender, aggravated offender, chronic offender, or
habitual offender shall not be granted a suspended imposition of sentence or be sentenced to
pay a fine in lieu of a term of imprisonment, section 557.011 to the contrary notwithstanding;
(2) As a prior offender shall not be granted parole or probation until he or she has
served a minimum of ten days imprisonment:

SS SCS HB 1740 19
(a) Unless as a condition of such parole or probation such person performs at least
thirty days of community service under the supervision of the court in those jurisdictions
which have a recognized program for community service; or
(b) The offender participates in and successfully completes a program established
under section 478.007 or other court-ordered treatment program, if available, and as part of
either program, the offender performs at least thirty days of community service under the
supervision of the court;
(3) As a persistent offender shall not be eligible for parole or probation until he or she
has served a minimum of thirty days imprisonment:
(a) Unless as a condition of such parole or probation such person performs at least
sixty days of community service under the supervision of the court in those jurisdictions
which have a recognized program for community service; or
(b) The offender participates in and successfully completes a program established
under section 478.007 or other court-ordered treatment program, if available, and as part of
either program, the offender performs at least sixty days of community service under the
supervision of the court;
(4) As an aggravated offender shall not be eligible for parole or probation until he or
she has served a minimum of sixty days imprisonment; and
(5) As a chronic or habitual offender shall not be eligible for parole or probation until
he or she has served a minimum of two years imprisonment[; and].
[(6)] 7. Any probation or parole granted under [this] subsection 6 of this sectionmay
include a period of continuous alcohol monitoring or verifiable breath alcohol testing
performed a minimum of four times per day.
8. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, an offender found
guilty under paragraph (b) of subdivision (6) of subsection 2 of this section shall not be
eligible for parole or probation until he or she has served a minimum of five years'
imprisonment.
9. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an offender found guilty under
100 subdivision (7) of subsection 2 of this section shall not be eligible for parole or probation
101 until he or she has served a minimum of ten years' imprisonment.
✔